dev/apertium-en-de/apertium-en-de.de.dix
    <pardef n="m/ögen__vblex">
      <e>       <p>   <l>ögen</l>    <r>ögen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ögend</l>   <r>ögen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ag</l>      <r>ögen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ögt</l>     <r>ögen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ag</l>      <r>ögen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>agst</l>    <r>ögen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ag</l>      <r>ögen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ögen</l>    <r>ögen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ögt</l>     <r>ögen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ögen</l>    <r>ögen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ochte</l>   <r>ögen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ochtest</l> <r>ögen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ochte</l>   <r>ögen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ochten</l>  <r>ögen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ochtet</l>  <r>ögen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ochten</l>  <r>ögen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aas/en__vblex">
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>end</l>     <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>t</l>       <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>e</l>       <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>t</l>       <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>t</l>       <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>t</l>       <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>te</l>      <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>test</l>    <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>te</l>      <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ten</l>     <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>tet</l>     <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ten</l>     <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="achte/n__vblex">
      <e>       <p>   <l>n</l>       <r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>nd</l>      <r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>t</l>       <r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>st</l>      <r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>t</l>       <r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>n</l>       <r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>t</l>       <r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>n</l>       <r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>te</l>      <r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>test</l>    <r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>te</l>      <r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ten</l>     <r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>tet</l>     <r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ten</l>     <r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ack/ern__vblex">
      <e>       <p>   <l>ern</l>     <r>ern<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ernd</l>    <r>ern<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>er</l>      <r>ern<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ert</l>     <r>ern<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ere</l>     <r>ern<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>erst</l>    <r>ern<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ert</l>     <r>ern<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ern</l>     <r>ern<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ert</l>     <r>ern<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ern</l>     <r>ern<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>erte</l>    <r>ern<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ertest</l>  <r>ern<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>erte</l>    <r>ern<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>erten</l>   <r>ern<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ertet</l>   <r>ern<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>erten</l>   <r>ern<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ahnden"><i>ahnde</i><par n="achte/n__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="altern"><i>alt</i><par n="ack/ern__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="anfassen"><i>anfass</i><par n="aas/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="anpassen"><i>anpass</i><par n="aas/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="auflösen"><i>auflös</i><par n="aas/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aufpassen"><i>aufpass</i><par n="aas/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="auslösen"><i>auslös</i><par n="aas/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ausweiten"><i>ausweite</i><par n="achte/n__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="baden"><i>bade</i><par n="achte/n__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="begrüßen"><i>begrüß</i><par n="aas/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="betten"><i>bette</i><par n="achte/n__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="blättern"><i>blätt</i><par n="ack/ern__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="blitzen"><i>blitz</i><par n="aas/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="booten"><i>boote</i><par n="achte/n__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="breiten"><i>breite</i><par n="achte/n__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bremsen"><i>brems</i><par n="aas/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="büßen"><i>büß</i><par n="aas/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dichten"><i>dichte</i><par n="achte/n__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="donnern"><i>donn</i><par n="ack/ern__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dösen"><i>dös</i><par n="aas/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="duften"><i>dufte</i><par n="achte/n__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="eignen"><i>eigne</i><par n="achte/n__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="einlösen"><i>einlös</i><par n="aas/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="enden"><i>ende</i><par n="achte/n__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="erden"><i>erde</i><par n="achte/n__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="erfassen"><i>erfass</i><par n="aas/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fassen"><i>fass</i><par n="aas/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fasten"><i>faste</i><par n="achte/n__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="faxen"><i>fax</i><par n="aas/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="feuern"><i>feu</i><par n="ack/ern__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="filtern"><i>filt</i><par n="ack/ern__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="flüchten"><i>flüchte</i><par n="achte/n__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="grasen"><i>gras</i><par n="aas/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gründen"><i>gründe</i><par n="achte/n__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="grüßen"><i>grüß</i><par n="aas/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="haften"><i>hafte</i><par n="achte/n__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hasten"><i>haste</i><par n="achte/n__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hetzen"><i>hetz</i><par n="aas/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hineinpassen"><i>hineinpass</i><par n="aas/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hissen"><i>hiss</i><par n="aas/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hungern"><i>hung</i><par n="ack/ern__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="husten"><i>huste</i><par n="achte/n__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="jammern"><i>jamm</i><par n="ack/ern__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="klettern"><i>klett</i><par n="ack/ern__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kneten"><i>knete</i><par n="achte/n__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kotzen"><i>kotz</i><par n="aas/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kreuzen"><i>kreuz</i><par n="aas/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="küssen"><i>küss</i><par n="aas/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lasten"><i>laste</i><par n="achte/n__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lästern"><i>läst</i><par n="ack/ern__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lauern"><i>lau</i><par n="ack/ern__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lindern"><i>lind</i><par n="ack/ern__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mixen"><i>mix</i><par n="aas/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="modern"><i>mod</i><par n="ack/ern__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mögen"><i>m</i><par n="m/ögen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="niesen"><i>nies</i><par n="aas/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nisten"><i>niste</i><par n="achte/n__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="passen"><i>pass</i><par n="aas/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pflastern"><i>pflast</i><par n="ack/ern__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="plündern"><i>plünd</i><par n="ack/ern__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="poltern"><i>polt</i><par n="ack/ern__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="reisen"><i>reis</i><par n="aas/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rudern"><i>rud</i><par n="ack/ern__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="runden"><i>runde</i><par n="achte/n__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="scheitern"><i>scheit</i><par n="ack/ern__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="schildern"><i>schild</i><par n="ack/ern__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="schimmern"><i>schimm</i><par n="ack/ern__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="schippern"><i>schipp</i><par n="ack/ern__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="schmieden"><i>schmiede</i><par n="achte/n__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="schneidern"><i>schneid</i><par n="ack/ern__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="spenden"><i>spende</i><par n="achte/n__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="stützen"><i>stütz</i><par n="aas/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tasten"><i>taste</i><par n="achte/n__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="trauern"><i>trau</i><par n="ack/ern__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="verallgemeinern"><i>verallgemein</i><par n="ack/ern__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vermissen"><i>vermiss</i><par n="aas/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="versenden"><i>versende</i><par n="achte/n__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="wandern"><i>wand</i><par n="ack/ern__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="warten"><i>warte</i><par n="achte/n__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="wetten"><i>wette</i><par n="achte/n__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="wirtschaften"><i>wirtschafte</i><par n="achte/n__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zaubern"><i>zaub</i><par n="ack/ern__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zusammenpressen"><i>zusammenpress</i><par n="aas/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zwinkern"><i>zwink</i><par n="ack/ern__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zwitschern"><i>zwitsch</i><par n="ack/ern__vblex"/></e>
